Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4108.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 8. An individual who, having no duty to do so, in a good-faith response to an emergency medical situation, voluntarily applies bleeding control, through pressure, a dressing, packing, or a tourniquet, to another individual is not liable in a civil action for damages resulting from an act or omission in applying the bleeding control, except an act or omission that constitutes gross negligence or willful and wanton misconduct. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 4847 (request no. H02316'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.